Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-531
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Redevelopment Act shall be full authority for the creation of or to act as a contracting public body by a city or cities and for the exercise of the powers of the act granted to a city or cities and to such contracting public bodies, and no action, proceeding, or election shall be required prior to the creation of or action by a contracting public body or to authorize the exercise of any of the powers granted in the act, except as specifically provided in the act, any provision of law or of any city charter or village law to the contrary notwithstanding.

No proceedings for the issuance of bonds of a contracting public body are required other than those required by the provisions of the act, and the provisions of all other laws and city charters, if any, relative to the terms and conditions for the issuance, payment, redemption, registration, sale, or delivery of bonds of public bodies, corporations, or political subdivisions of this state shall not be applicable to bonds issued by a contracting public body pursuant to the act.

Insofar as the provisions of the act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or of any city charter, if any, the provisions of the act shall be controlling.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 31.